New York, session 2025-2026, A4318.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 2 of section 11-0715 of the environmental 2 conservation law, as amended by section 4 of part R of chapter 58 of the 3 laws of 2013, is amended to read as follows: 4 2. A member of the Shinnecock tribe or the Poospatuck tribe or a 5 member of the six nations, residing on any reservation wholly or partly 6 within the state, is entitled to receive free of charge a fishing 7 license, a hunting license, a muzzle-loading privilege, a trapping 8 license, and a bowhunting privilege; a [resident of the state who is a] 9 member of the United States armed forces in active service who is not 10 stationed within the state and has not been herein longer than thirty 11 days on leave or furlough, is entitled to receive free of charge a fish- 12 ing license, a hunting license, and a trapping license; [a resident of 13 the state who is] an active member of the organized militia of the state 14 of New York as defined by section one of the military law, or the 15 reserve components of the armed forces of the United States, and exclud- 16 ing members of the inactive national guard and individual ready reserve, 17 is entitled to receive free of charge a fishing license, a hunting 18 license, and a trapping license; and a resident who is blind is entitled 19 to receive a fishing license free of charge. For the purposes of this 20 subdivision a person is blind only if either: (a) [his or her] their 21 central visual acuity does not exceed 20/200 in the better eye with 22 correcting lenses, or (b) [his or her] their visual acuity is greater 23 than 20/200 but is accompanied by a limitation of the field of vision EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01225-01-5 A. 4318 2 1 such that the widest diameter of the visual field subtends an angle no 2 greater than 20 degrees. 3 A resident in the state for a period of thirty days immediately prior 4 to the date of application who has attained the age of seventy is enti- 5 tled to receive a fishing license, a trapping license, and a hunting 6 license, at a cost of five dollars for each license. 7 A resident in the state for a period of thirty days immediately prior 8 to the date of application who has attained the age of seventy is enti- 9 tled to receive free of charge a bowhunting privilege and a muzzle-load- 10 ing privilege. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.